Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3,110
Department of Revenue Miscellaneous Receipts Fund; created; termination.

The Department of Revenue Miscellaneous Receipts Fund is hereby created. The fund terminates on July 1, 2026, and the State Treasurer shall transfer any money in the fund on such date to the Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 212;

Laws 1993, LB 345, § 10;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 79;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 54;

Laws 2020, LB1042, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB647, § 30;

Laws 2026, LB901, § 20.
July 1, 2026